Alabama, session 2026rs, SB363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Alabama Centralized Grant Management Act.
Section 2. (a) The Alabama Grant Management Database is
established within the Alabama Department of Economic and
Community Affairs.
(b) The department, through the implementation of the
database, shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a centralized, publicly
accessible online platform listing all available federal and
state grant opportunities administered by state agencies for
which Alabama entities are eligible;
(2) Publish and maintain a voluntary registry of
qualified grant writers, consultants, and technical assistance
providers who may be available to assist grant applicants;
(3) Provide guidance to assist local governments, small
businesses, nonprofits, and other eligible entities in
identifying and applying for grants;
(4) Coordinate with state agencies to ensure grant
information is timely and accurate; and
(5) Submit an annual report to the Governor, Lieutenant
Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and
President Pro Tempore of the Senate on the number of grants
listed, number of users of the database, and any barriers to
the administration of the database identified by the
department.
Section 3. (a) The Alabama Department of Economic and
Page 2

Section 3. (a) The Alabama Department of Economic and
SB363 INTRODUCED
Community Affairs shall establish and maintain a voluntary
register of individuals and firms who provide grant writing or
technical assistance services.
(b) Individuals and firms who wish to appear on the
registry shall submit relevant qualifications, experience, and
contact information, as determined by rule of the department
pursuant to Section 4.
(c) The registry shall be made publicly available on
the same online platform as the listing of grants pursuant to
Section 2(b)(1).
Section 4. (a) The Alabama Department of Economic and
Community Affairs may adopt rules to implement and administer
this act.
(b) All state agencies shall cooperate with the
department by providing the contact information and
information pertaining to their respective grant programs
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.
(c) The database shall be funded through appropriations
by the Legislature.
Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3